Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2926
Approved program for education and training.

The board may approve programs for physical therapy or physical therapist assistant education and training. Such approval may be based on the program's accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation in Physical Therapy Education or equivalent standards established by the board.

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 4, p. 1076;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 142;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 170;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-2804;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 144;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,388;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1019.